lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/redup.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
á é í ú ý ø æ å ð 
%^UUML:0 %^IUML:0 %>:0
;

Sets
Vow = a e o u i y á é í ó ú ý ø æ å ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x ;

Rules

"t:0"
t:0 <=> i _ ä x ;

"u-umlaut"
a:ø <=> _ Cns:* %^UUML:  ;

!"i-umlaut"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* %^IUML: ;
!      where Vx in ( á ó a )
!		    Vy in ( æ æ e )
!      matched ;
